California statutes. Penal Code
(c) As used in this chapter, “pretrial diversion” means the procedure of postponing prosecution either temporarily or permanently at any point in the judicial process from the point at which the accused is charged until adjudication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.51.

(a) This chapter shall apply whenever a case is before any court upon an accusatory pleading concerning the commission of a misdemeanor, except a misdemeanor specified in subdivision (b), and it appears to the court that all of the following apply to the defendant:

(1) The defendant’s record does not indicate that probation or parole has ever been revoked without thereafter being completed.

(2) The defendant’s record does not indicate that he has been diverted pursuant to this chapter within five years prior to the filing of the accusatory pleading which charges the divertible offense.

(3) The defendant has never been convicted of a felony, and has not been convicted of a misdemeanor within five years prior to the filing of the accusatory pleading which charges the divertible offense.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to any pretrial diversion or posttrial program otherwise established by this code, nor shall this chapter be deemed to authorize any pretrial diversion or posttrial program for any person alleged to have committed a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) This chapter shall not apply whenever the accusatory pleading charges the commission of a misdemeanor:

(1) For which incarceration would be mandatory upon conviction of the defendant.

(2) For which registration would be required pursuant to Section 290 upon conviction of the defendant.

(3) Which the magistrate determines shall be prosecuted as a misdemeanor pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 17.

(4) Which involves the use of force or violence against a person, unless the charge is of a violation of Section 241 or 243.

(5) For which the granting of probation is prohibited.

(6) Which is a driving offense punishable as a misdemeanor pursuant to the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.52.

(a) If the defendant consents and waives his right to a speedy trial, the case shall be referred to the probation department. The probation department shall conduct such investigation as is necessary to determine whether the defendant qualifies for diversion under subdivision (a) of Section 1001.51, and whether he or she is a person who would be benefited by education, treatment or rehabilitation. The probation department shall also determine which educational, treatment or rehabilitative plan would benefit the defendant. The probation department shall report its findings and recommendation to the court. If the recommendation includes referral to a community program, the report shall contain a statement regarding the program’s willingness to accept the defendant and the manner in which the services they offer can assist the defendant in completing the diversion program successfully.

(b) No statement, or any information procured therefrom, made by the defendant to any probation officer, which is made during the course of any investigation conducted by the probation department pursuant to subdivision (b), and prior to the reporting of the probation department’s findings and recommendations to the court, shall be admissible in any action or proceeding brought subsequent to the investigation.

No statement, or any information procured therefrom, with respect to the specific offense with which the defendant is charged, which is made to any probation officer subsequent to the granting of diversion, shall be admissible in any action or proceeding.

In the event that diversion is either denied, or is subsequently revoked once it has been granted, neither the probation investigation nor statements or information divulged during that investigation shall be used in any pretrial sentencing procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.53.

The court shall hold a hearing and, after consideration of the probation department’s report, and any other relevant information, shall determine if the defendant consents to further proceedings under this chapter and waives his or her right to a speedy trial. If the court orders a defendant to be diverted, the court may make inquiry into the financial condition of the defendant, and upon a finding that the defendant is able in whole or in part, to pay the reasonable cost of diversion, the court may order him or her to pay all or part of such expense. The reasonable cost of diversion shall not exceed the amount determined to be the actual average cost of diversion services.

If the court does not deem the defendant to be a person who would be benefited by diversion, or if the defendant does not consent to participate, the proceedings shall continue as in any other case.

At such time that a defendant’s case is diverted, any bail bond or undertaking, or deposit in lieu thereof, on file by or on behalf of the defendant shall be exonerated, and the court shall enter an order so directing.

The period during which the further criminal proceedings against the defendant may be diverted shall be for the length of time required to complete and verify the diversion program but in no case shall it exceed two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.54.

If it appears to the probation department that the divertee is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program, or that the divertee is not benefiting from education, treatment or rehabilitation, or that the divertee is convicted of a misdemeanor in which force or violence is used, or if the divertee is convicted of a felony, after notice to the divertee, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the criminal proceedings should be reinstituted. If the court finds that the divertee is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, or that the divertee is not benefiting from diversion, or the court finds that the divertee has been convicted of a crime as indicated above, the criminal case shall be referred back to the court for resumption of the criminal proceedings. If the divertee has performed satisfactorily during the period of diversion, at the end of the period of diversion, the criminal charges shall be dismissed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.55.

(a) Any record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition in those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter. Upon successful completion of a diversion program, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed to have never occurred. The divertee may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior criminal record that he or she was not arrested or diverted for the offense, except as specified in subdivision (b). A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of a diversion program shall not, without the divertee’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(b) The divertee shall be advised that, regardless of his or her successful completion of diversion, the arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice in response to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not relieve him or her of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9A. Bad Check Diversion [1001.60. - 1001.67.]

1001.60.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors declaring that there are sufficient funds available to fund the program, the district attorney may create within his or her office a diversion program pursuant to this chapter for persons who write bad checks. For purposes of this chapter, “writing a bad check” means making, drawing, uttering, or delivering any check or draft upon any bank or depository for the payment of money where there is probable cause to believe there has been a violation of Section 476a. The program may be conducted by the district attorney or by a private entity under contract with the district attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.61.

The district attorney may refer a bad check case to the diversion program. Except as provided in Section 1001.64, this chapter does not limit the power of the district attorney to prosecute bad check complaints.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1059, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.62.

On receipt of a bad check case, the district attorney shall determine if the case is one which is appropriate to be referred to the bad check diversion program. In determining whether to refer a case to the bad check diversion program, the district attorney shall consider, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The amount of the bad check.

(b) If the person has a prior criminal record or has previously been diverted. 

(c) The number of bad check grievances against the person previously received by the district attorney.

(d) Whether there are other bad check grievances currently pending against the person.

(e) The strength of the evidence, if any, of intent to defraud the victim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1059, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.63.

On referral of a bad check case to the diversion program, a notice shall be forwarded by mail to the person alleged to have written the bad check which contains all of the following:

(a) The date and amount of the bad check.

(b) The name of the payee.

(c) The date before which the person must contact the person designated by the district attorney concerning the bad check.

(d) A statement of the penalty for issuance of a bad check.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1059, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.64.

The district attorney may enter into a written agreement with the person to forego prosecution on the bad check for a period to be determined by the district attorney, not to exceed six months, pending all of the following:

(a) Completion of a class or classes conducted by the district attorney or private entity under contract with the district attorney.

(b) Full restitution being made to the victim of the bad check to hold offenders accountable for victims’ losses as a result of criminal conduct. For the purpose of this subdivision, “restitution” means the face value of the bad check or bad checks and any bank charges, as described in Section 1001.65.

(c) Full payment of the diversion fees, if any, specified in Section 1001.65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 264, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.65.

(a) A district attorney may collect a processing fee if his or her office collects and processes a bad check. The amount of the fee shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) for each bad check in addition to the actual amount of any bank charges, including the returned check fee, if any, incurred by the victim as a result of the offense.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when a criminal complaint is filed in a bad check case after the maker of the check fails to comply with the terms of the bad check diversion program, the court, after conviction, may impose a bad check processing fee for the recovery and processing efforts by the district attorney of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each bad check in addition to the actual amount of any bank charges incurred by the victim as a result of the offense, including the returned check fee, if any, not to exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) in the aggregate. The court also may, as a condition of probation, require a defendant to participate in and successfully complete a check writing education class. If so required, the court shall make inquiry into the financial condition of the defendant and, upon a finding that the defendant is able in whole or part to pay the expense of the education class, the court may order him or her to pay for all or part of that expense.

(c) If the district attorney elects to collect any fee for bank charges incurred by the victim pursuant to this section, including any fee charged for a returned check, that fee shall be paid to the victim for any bank fees that the victim may have been assessed. In no event shall reimbursement of a bank charge to the victim pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per check.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 264, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.66.

At no time shall a defendant be required to make an admission of guilt as a prerequisite for placement in a precomplaint diversion program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1059, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.67.

No statement, or information procured therefrom, made by the defendant in connection with the determination of his or her eligibility for diversion, and no statement, or information procured therefrom, made by the defendant, subsequent to the granting of diversion or while participating in the program, and no information contained in any report made with respect thereto, and no statement or other information concerning the defendant’s participation in the program shall be admissible in any action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1059, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9B. Parental Diversion [1001.70. - 1001.75.]

1001.70.

(a) Every local prosecutor with jurisdiction to prosecute violations of Section 272 shall review annually any diversion program established pursuant to this chapter, and no program shall commence or continue without the approval of the local prosecutor. No person shall be diverted under a program unless it has been approved by the local prosecutor. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize the prosecutor to determine whether a particular defendant shall be diverted.

(b) As used in this chapter, “pretrial diversion” means the procedure of postponing prosecution either temporarily or permanently at any point in the judicial process from the point at which the accused is charged until adjudication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1256, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.71.

This chapter shall apply whenever a case is before any court upon an accusatory pleading alleging a parent or legal guardian to have violated Section 272 with respect to his or her minor child, and all of the following apply to the defendant:

(a) The defendant’s record does not indicate that probation or parole has ever been revoked without thereafter being completed.

(b) The defendant’s record does not indicate that he or she has previously been diverted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.72.

(a) If the defendant consents and waives his or her right to a speedy trial, the case shall be referred to the probation department. The probation department shall conduct an investigation as is necessary to determine whether the defendant qualifies for diversion under this chapter, and whether he or she is a person who would be benefited by education, treatment, or rehabilitation. The probation department shall also determine which education, treatment, or rehabilitative plan would benefit the defendant. The probation department shall report its findings and recommendations to the court. If the recommendation includes referral to a community program, the report shall contain a statement regarding the program’s willingness to accept the defendant and the manner in which the services they offer can assist the defendant in completing the diversion program successfully.

(b) No statement, or any information procured therefrom, made by the defendant to any probation officer, which is made during the course of any investigation conducted by the probation department pursuant to subdivision (a), and prior to the reporting of the probation department’s findings and recommendations to the court, shall be admissible in any action or proceeding brought subsequent to the investigation.

No statement, or any information procured therefrom, with respect to the specific offense with which the defendant is charged which is made to any probation officer subsequent to the granting of diversion, shall be admissible in any action or proceeding.

In the event that diversion is either denied or is subsequently revoked once it has been granted, neither the probation investigation nor statements or information divulged during that investigation shall be used in any pretrial sentencing procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1256, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.73.

The court shall hold a hearing and, after consideration of the probation department’s report, and any other relevant information, shall determine if the defendant consents to further proceedings under this chapter and waives his or her right to a speedy trial. If the court orders a defendant to be diverted, the court may make inquiry into the financial condition of the defendant, and upon a finding that the defendant is able, in whole or in part, to pay the reasonable cost of diversion, the court may order him or her to pay all or part of the expense. The reasonable cost of diversion shall not exceed the amount determined to be the actual average cost of diversion services.

If the court does not deem the defendant to be a person who would be benefited by diversion or if the defendant does not consent to participate, the proceedings shall continue as in any other case.

At the time that a defendant’s case is diverted, any bail bond or undertaking, or deposit in lieu thereof, on file by or on behalf of the defendant shall be exonerated, and the court shall enter an order so directing.

The period during which the further criminal proceedings against the defendant may be diverted shall be for the length of time required to complete and verify the diversion program but in no case shall it exceed two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1256, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.74.

If it appears to the probation department that the divertee is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program, or that the divertee is not benefiting from education, treatment, or rehabilitation, or that the divertee is convicted of a misdemeanor in which force or violence was used, or if the divertee is convicted of a felony, after notice to the divertee, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the criminal proceedings should be reinstituted. If the court finds that the divertee is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, or that the divertee has been convicted of a crime as indicated above, the criminal case shall be referred back to the court for resumption of the criminal proceedings. If the divertee has performed satisfactorily during the period of diversion, the criminal charges shall be dismissed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1256, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.75.

(a) Any record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition in those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter. Upon successful completion of a diversion program, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed to have never occurred. The divertee may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior criminal record that he or she was not arrested or diverted for that offense, except as specified in subdivision (b). A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of a diversion program shall not, without the divertee’s consent, be used in any way that would result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(b) The divertee shall be advised that, regardless of his or her successful completion of diversion, the arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice in response to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not relieve him or her of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 743, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9C. Military Diversion Program [1001.80. - 1001.80.]

1001.80.

(a) This chapter shall apply to a case before a court on an accusatory pleading alleging the commission of a misdemeanor or felony offense not set forth in subdivision (o) to a defendant who is eligible based on the criteria set forth in this chapter.

(b) A defendant charged with a misdemeanor is eligible for diversion if both of the following apply:

(1) The defendant was, or currently is, a member of the United States military.

(2) (A) The defendant may be suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder,
 substance abuse, or mental health problems as a result of their military service.

(B) The court may request, using existing resources, an assessment to aid in the determination that this paragraph applies to a defendant.

(c) A defendant charged with a felony offense not set forth in subdivision (o) is eligible if both of the following apply:

(1) The defendant was, or currently is, a member of the United States military.

(2) (A) The defendant may be suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or a mental health problem as a result of their military service, and the
 defendant’s condition was a significant factor in the commission of the charged offense.

(B) The court shall find that the defendant’s condition was a significant factor in the commission of the offense unless there is clear and convincing evidence that it was not a motivating factor, causal factor, or contributing factor to the defendant’s involvement in the alleged offense.

(C) A court may consider any relevant and credible evidence, including, but not limited to, a police report, preliminary hearing transcript, witness statement, statement by the defendant’s mental health treatment provider, medical record, or record or report by qualified medical expert, that the defendant displayed symptoms consistent with the condition at or near the time of the offense.

(D) The court may request, using existing resources, an assessment to aid in the determination that this paragraph applies to a defendant.

(d) If the court determines that a defendant charged with an applicable offense under this chapter is a person described in subdivision (b) or (c), the court, with the consent of the defendant and a waiver of the defendant’s speedy trial right, may place the defendant in a pretrial diversion program as defined in subdivision (k).

(e) If it appears to the court that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program, or that the defendant is not benefiting from the treatment and services provided under the diversion program, after notice to the defendant, the court
 shall hold a hearing to determine whether the criminal proceedings should be reinstituted. If the court finds that the defendant is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, or that the defendant is not benefiting from diversion, the court may end the diversion and order resumption of the criminal proceedings. If the defendant has performed satisfactorily during the period of diversion, at the end of the period of diversion, the criminal charges shall be dismissed.

(f) If a referral is made to the county mental health authority as part of the pretrial diversion program, the county shall provide mental health treatment services only to the extent that resources are available for that purpose as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If mental health treatment
 services are ordered by the court, the county mental health agency shall coordinate appropriate referral of the defendant to the county veterans service officer as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The county mental health agency is not responsible for providing services outside its traditional scope of services. An order shall be made referring a defendant to a county mental health agency only if that agency has agreed to accept responsibility for all of the following:

(1) The treatment of the defendant.

(2) The coordination of appropriate referral to a county veterans service officer.

(3) The filing of reports pursuant to subdivision (j).

(g) When determining the requirements of a pretrial diversion program pursuant to this chapter, the court shall assess whether the defendant should be ordered to participate in a federal or community-based treatment service program with a demonstrated history of specializing in the treatment of mental health problems, including substance abuse, post-traumatic stress disorder, traumatic brain injury, military sexual trauma, and other related mental health problems.

(h) The court, in making an order pursuant to this section to commit a defendant to an established treatment program, shall give preference to a treatment program that has a history of successfully treating veterans who suffer from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse,
 or mental health problems as a result of military service, including, but not limited to, programs operated by the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(i) The court and the assigned treatment program may collaborate with the Department of Veterans Affairs and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to maximize benefits and services provided to a veteran.

(j) The period during which criminal proceedings against the defendant may be diverted shall be no longer than two years. The responsible agency or agencies shall file reports on the defendant’s progress in the diversion program with the court and with the prosecutor not less than every six months.

(k) A
 record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition of those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter. Upon successful completion of a diversion program, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed to have never occurred. The defendant may indicate in response to a question concerning their prior criminal record that they were not arrested or diverted for the offense, except as specified in subdivision (l). A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of a diversion program shall not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in a way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(l) The defendant shall be advised that, regardless of their successful completion of diversion, the arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the
 Department of Justice in response to a peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (k), this section does not relieve them of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to a direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer as defined in Section 830.

(m) (1) As used in this chapter, “pretrial diversion” means the procedure of postponing prosecution, either temporarily or permanently, at any point in the judicial process from the point at which the accused is charged until adjudication.

(2) A pretrial diversion program shall utilize existing resources available to current or former members of the United States military to address and treat those suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain
 injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems as a result of military service.

(n) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 23640 of the Vehicle Code, an offense for which a defendant may be placed in a pretrial diversion program in accordance with this section includes a misdemeanor violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, however, this section does not limit the authority of the Department of Motor Vehicles to take administrative action concerning the driving privileges of a person
 arrested for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) A defendant shall not be placed in a pretrial diversion program in accordance with this section for any offense related to driving under the influence other than those identified in paragraph (1).

(o) A defendant may not be placed into a diversion program, pursuant to this section, for the following current charged offenses:

(1) Murder or voluntary manslaughter.

(2) An offense for which a person, if convicted, would be required to register pursuant to Section 290, except for a violation of Section 314.

(3) Rape.

(4) Lewd or lascivious act on a child under 14 years of age.

(5) Assault with intent to commit rape, sodomy, or oral copulation in violation of Section 220.

(6) Commission of rape or sexual penetration in concert with another person in violation of Section 264.1.

(7) Continuous sexual abuse of a child in violation of Section 288.5.

(8) A violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11418.

(p) (1) The prosecution may request an order from the court that
 the defendant be prohibited from controlling, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm until they successfully complete diversion because they are a danger to themselves or others pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The prosecution shall bear the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, both of the following are true:

(A) The defendant poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to themselves or another by controlling, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm.

(B) The prohibition is necessary to prevent personal injury to the defendant or another person because less restrictive alternatives either have been tried and found to
 be ineffective or are inadequate or inappropriate for the circumstances of the defendant.

(3) (A) If the court finds that the prosecution has not met that burden, the court shall not order that the person is prohibited from controlling, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm.

(B) If the court finds that the prosecution has met the burden, the court shall order that the person is prohibited, and shall inform the person that they are prohibited, from controlling, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm until they successfully complete diversion because they are a danger to themselves or others.

(4) An order imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be in effect
 until the defendant has successfully completed diversion or until their firearm rights are restored pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   (SB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9D. Theft and Repeat Theft Crimes Diversion or Deferred Entry of Judgment Program [1001.81. - 1001.82.]

1001.81.

(a) The city or county prosecuting attorney or county probation department may create a diversion or deferred entry of judgment program pursuant to this section for persons who commit a theft offense or repeat theft offenses. The program may be conducted by the prosecuting attorney’s office or the county probation department.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), this chapter does not limit the power of the prosecuting attorney to prosecute theft or repeat theft.

(c) If a county creates a diversion or deferred entry of judgment program for individuals committing a theft offense or repeat theft offenses, on receipt of a case or at arraignment, the prosecuting attorney shall either refer the case
 to the county probation department to conduct a prefiling investigation report to assess the appropriateness of program placement or, if the prosecuting attorney’s office operates the program, determine if the case is one that is appropriate to be referred to the program. In determining whether to refer a case to the program, the probation department or prosecuting attorney shall consider, but is not limited to, all of the following factors:

(1) Any prefiling investigation report conducted by the county probation department or nonprofit contract agency operating the program that evaluates the individual’s risk and needs and the appropriateness of program placement.

(2) If the person demonstrates a willingness to engage in community service, restitution, or other mechanisms to repair the harm caused by the criminal activity and address the underlying drivers of the criminal
 activity.

(3) If a risk and needs assessment identifies underlying substance abuse or mental health needs or other drivers of criminal activity that can be addressed through the diversion or deferred entry of judgment program.

(4) If the person has a violent or serious prior criminal record or has previously been referred to a diversion program and failed that program.

(5) Any relevant information concerning the efficacy of the program in reducing the likelihood of participants committing future offenses.

(d) On referral of a case to the program, a notice shall be provided, or forwarded by mail, to the person alleged to have committed the offense with both of the following:

(1) The date by
 which the person must contact the diversion program or deferred entry of judgment program in the manner designated by the supervising agency.

(2) A statement of the penalty for the offense or offenses with which that person has been charged.

(e) The prosecuting attorney may enter into a written agreement with the person to refrain from, or defer, prosecution on the offense or offenses on the following conditions:

(1) Completion of the program requirements such as community service or courses reasonably required by the prosecuting attorney.

(2) Making adequate restitution or an appropriate substitute for restitution to the establishment or person from which property was stolen at the face value of the stolen property, if required by the program.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “repeat theft offenses” means being cited or convicted for misdemeanor or felony theft from a store or from a vehicle two or more times in the previous 12 months and failing to appear in court when cited for these crimes or continuing to engage in these crimes after release or after conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 154.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1001.82.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.82.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 168, Sec. 7.   (AB 2943)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 2.9D, commencing with Section 1001.81.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.9E. Primary Caregiver Diversion [1001.83. - 1001.83.]

1001.83.

(a) The presiding judge of the superior court, or a judge designated by the presiding judge, in consultation with the presiding juvenile court judge and criminal court judges, and together with the prosecuting entity and the public defender or the contracted criminal defense office that provides the services of a public defender, may agree in writing to establish and conduct a pretrial diversion program for primary caregivers, pursuant to the provisions of
 this chapter, wherein criminal proceedings are suspended without a plea of guilty for a period of not less than 6 months and not more than 24 months. If the defendant is also participating in juvenile court proceedings, the juvenile and criminal courts shall not duplicate efforts.

(b) The program described in this section may include, but not be limited to, all of the following components:

(1) Parenting classes.

(2) Family and individual counseling.

(3) Mental health screening,
 education, and treatment.

(4) Family case management services.

(5) Drug and alcohol treatment.

(6) Domestic violence education and prevention.

(7) Physical and sexual abuse counseling.

(8) Anger management.

(9) Vocational and educational services.

(10) Job training and placement.

(11) Affordable and safe housing assistance.

(12) Financial literacy courses.

(c) The defendant may be referred to supportive services and classes in already existing diversion programs and county outpatient services. Before approving a proposed treatment program, the court shall consider the request of the defense, the request of the prosecution, the needs of the defendant and the dependent child or children, and the interests of the community. The programming may be procured using public or private funds. A referral may be made to a county agency, existing collaborative court, or assisted outpatient treatment or services, if the entity agrees to provide the required programming.

(d) On an accusatory pleading alleging the commission of a misdemeanor or felony offense, the court may, after considering the positions of the defense and prosecution, grant pretrial diversion to a defendant pursuant to this section if the defendant meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The defendant is a custodial parent or legal guardian of a
 minor child under 18 years of age, presently resides in the same household as that child, presently provides care or financial support for that minor child either alone or with the assistance of other household members, and the defendant’s absence in the child’s life would be detrimental to the child.

(2) The defendant has been advised of and waived the right to a speedy trial and a speedy preliminary hearing.

(3) The defendant has been informed of and agrees to comply with the requirements of the program.

(4) The court is satisfied that the defendant will not pose an unreasonable risk of danger to public safety, as defined in Section 1170.18, or to the minor child in their custody, if allowed to remain in the community. The court may consider the
 positions of the prosecuting entity and defense counsel, the defendant’s violence and criminal history, the recency of the defendant’s criminal history, the defendant’s history of behavior towards minors, the risk of the dependent minor’s exposure to or involvement in criminal activity, the current charged offense, child welfare history involving the defendant, and any other factors that the court deems appropriate.
